test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-í3ssk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ísska - ok : # -m animate noun, pail AEW NA1
     ísska+NA+Sg: ísska
     ísska+NA+Pl: íssiksi
     ísska+NA+Obv: ísski
     ísska+NA+Non: isskí
     
     ísska+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: nóóhka
     ísska+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: nóóhkiksi
     ísska+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: nóóhki
     ísska+NA+Px1Sg+Non: nóóhki
     
     ísska+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: nóóhkinnaana
     ísska+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: nóóhkinnaaniksi
     ísska+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: nóóhkinnaani
     ísska+NA+Px1Pl+Non: nóóhkinnaani

     ísska+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: kóóhkinnoona
     ísska+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: kóóhkinnooniksi
     ísska+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: kóóhkinnooni
     ísska+NA+Px21Pl+Non: kóóhkinnooni

     ísska+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: kóóhka
     ísska+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: kóóhkiksi
     ísska+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: kóóhki
     ísska+NA+Px2Sg+Non: kóóhki

     ísska+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: kóóhkoaawa
     ísska+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: kóóhkoaawaiksi
     ísska+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: kóóhkoaawayi
     ísska+NA+Px2Pl+Non: kóóhkoaawai

     ísska+NA+Px3Sg+Sg: óóhka
     ísska+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: óóhkiksi
     ísska+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: óóhki
     ísska+NA+Px3Sg+Non: óóhki

     ísska+NA+Px3Pl+Sg: óóhkoaawa
     ísska+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: óóhkoaawaiksi
     ísska+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: óóhkoaawayi
     ísska+NA+Px3Pl+Non: óóhkoaawai
